Tennessee, session 114, HB1462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-27-701, is amended by adding
the following as new subdivisions:
( ) "Emergency vehicle" means a passenger motor vehicle, motorcycle, or
bicycle designated by a law enforcement agency or the entity for which another first
responder works for official use by the first responder;
( ) "First responder" means a firefighter, emergency services personnel,
including an emergency medical technician or paramedic or emergency management
personnel, or law enforcement officer;
( ) "Law enforcement agency" means a lawfully established federal, state, or
local public agency that is responsible for the prevention and detection of crime, local
government code enforcement, and the enforcement of penal, traffic, regulatory, game,
or controlled substance laws;
( ) "Law enforcement officer":
(A) Means an individual employed by the federal, state, or a local
government as a member of the federal, state, or local government's law
enforcement agency, and trained and actively engaged in police work for the
investigation into and detection of crime; and
(B) Includes, but is not limited to, a capitol police officer, employee of the
Tennessee highway patrol, Tennessee bureau of investigation, or Tennessee
HB1462
009857
- 1 -

wildlife resources agency, and park rangers employed by the division of parks
and recreation in the department of environment and conservation.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 66, Chapter 27, Part 7, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A homeowners' association shall not:
(1) Prohibit or effectively prohibit a first responder from parking an
emergency vehicle at the first responder's residence or on a roadway adjacent to
the first responder's real property, including by adopting new or amending
existing declarations or rules and regulations; or
(2) Penalize or threaten to penalize a first responder regarding the first
responder parking an emergency vehicle at the first responder's residence or on
a roadway adjacent to the first responder's real property.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to declarations and rules and regulations adopted or amended on or after that date.
- 2 - 009857